browser/locales/l10n/da/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/da.aff
FLAG num
#Substantiv, konsonantfordobling, intetkøn, -er i flertal 
SFX 9 Y 120 
SFX 9 0 bet/944 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 ber/944 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 berne/944 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 bets/944 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 bers/944 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 bernes/944 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 cet/944 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 cer/944 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 cerne/944 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 cets/944 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 cers/944 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 cernes/944 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 det/944 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 der/944 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 derne/944 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 dets/944 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 ders/944 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 dernes/944 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 fet/944 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 fer/944 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 ferne/944 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 fets/944 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 fers/944 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 fernes/944 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 get/944 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 ger/944 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 gerne/944 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 gets/944 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 gers/944 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 gernes/944 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 het/944 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 her/944 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 herne/944 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 hets/944 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 hers/944 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 hernes/944 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 jet/944 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 jer/944 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 jerne/944 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 jets/944 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 jers/944 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 jernes/944 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 ket/944 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 ker/944 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 kerne/944 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 kets/944 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 kers/944 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 kernes/944 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 let/944 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 ler/944 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 lerne/944 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 lets/944 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 lers/944 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 lernes/944 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 met/944 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 mer/944 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 merne/944 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 mets/944 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 mers/944 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 mernes/944 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 net/944 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 ner/944 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 nerne/944 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 nets/944 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 ners/944 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 nernes/944 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 pet/944 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 per/944 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 perne/944 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 pets/944 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 pers/944 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 pernes/944 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 qet/944 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 qer/944 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 qerne/944 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 qets/944 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 qers/944 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 qernes/944 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 ret/944 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 rer/944 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 rerne/944 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 rets/944 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 rers/944 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 rernes/944 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 set/944 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 ser/944 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 serne/944 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 sets/944 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 sers/944 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 sernes/944 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 tet/944 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 ter/944 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 terne/944 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 tets/944 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 ters/944 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 ternes/944 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 vet/944 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 ver/944 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 verne/944 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 vets/944 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 vers/944 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 vernes/944 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 wet/944 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 wer/944 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 werne/944 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 wets/944 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 wers/944 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 wernes/944 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 xet/944 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 xer/944 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 xerne/944 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 xets/944 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 xers/944 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 xernes/944 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 zet/944 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 zer/944 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 zerne/944 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 zets/944 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 zers/944 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 9 0 zernes/944 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING

#Substantiv, intetkøn
SFX 10 Y 4
SFX 10 0 t/70,944 e	+BESTEMT_ENTAL
SFX 10 0 et/70,944 [^e]	+BESTEMT_ENTAL
SFX 10 0 ts/944 e	+GENITIV
SFX 10 0 ets/944 [^e]	+GENITIV
#Substantiv, flertal, med -e
SFX 20 Y 8
SFX 20 0 ne/70,944 er	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 20 0 ene/70,944 [^r]	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 20 0 e/70,944 .	+PLUR_UBEK
SFX 20 0 es/944 .	+GENITIV
SFX 20 0 enes/944 [^r]	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 20 0 nes/944 er	+GENITIV
SFX 20 0 ene/944 [^e]r	+PLUR_BEK
SFX 20 0 enes/944 [^e]r	+PLUR_BEK
#Ulovligt ord
FORBIDDENWORD 36
