browser/locales/l10n/da/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/da.dic
afholdshotel/70,9,976
afkog/70,252,10,976
afskriver/20,7,70,976
aktorat/70,10,73,976
album/70,9,976
altvejrsjager/20,7,70,976
analyseinstitut/70,9,976
ananasstykke/70,10,73,976
ansøgningsskema/70,10,73,976
appelsinbåd/20,7,70,976
arbejdsprogram/70,9,976
arkipelag/70,10,73,976
as/70,9,976
atlas/70,9,976
atriumgård/20,7,70,976
a-våbenfri/10,70,20,976
baggang/20,7,70,976
baglem/70,9,976
bankbud/10,70,20,976
banket/70,9,976
barberskraber/20,7,70,976
behov/70,252,10,976,939,947
beklædningsgenstand/20,7,70,976
bestyrelsesmedlem/70,9,976
bevæggrund/20,7,70,976
biblioteksudlån/70,252,10,976
billethul/70,9,976
biografbesøg/70,252,10,976
bitter/20,7,70,976,941,947
blindeinstitut/70,9,976
blomkålshoved/70,10,73,976
blomstertråd/20,7,70,976
boligudvalg/70,252,10,976
bondeplager/20,7,70,976
bordel/70,9,976,941,947
bravallaslag/70,252,10,976
brevåbner/20,7,70,976
bryggeri/70,10,73,976,941,947
bryllup/70,9,976,939,947
brøndgraver/20,7,70,976
busket/70,9,976
B-vitamin/70,10,73,976
byplanlægger/20,7,70,976
bølgeskær/70,252,10,976
børnepublikum/70,9,976
bådebygger/20,7,70,976
centralstyre/70,10,73,976
ces/70,9,976
christianshavner/20,7,70,976
cirkeldiagram/70,9,976
cockpit/70,9,976
cykelløb/70,252,10,976,939,947
cylinderlås/20,7,70,976
dagbogsnotat/70,9,976
danehof/70,9,976
datalager/70,252,10,976
debatforum/70,9,976,941,947
deltråd/20,7,70,976
diagram/70,9,976,941,947
diapositiv/70,10,73,976
dobbeltportræt/70,9,976
dollargrin/70,252,10,976
dommer/20,7,70,976,941,947
dræt/70,9,976
duelighedsbevis/70,10,73,976
dvaletilstand/20,7,70,976
dødstegn/70,252,10,976
døvelærer/20,7,70,976
eis/70,9,976
ejerlav/70,252,10,976
eksportfinansieringsfond/20,7,70,976
elitehold/70,252,10,976
ellevetal/70,9,976
engrossalg/70,252,10,976
enkeltland/10,70,20,976
epicentrum/70,9,976
ettal/70,9,976
eukalyptustræ/70,10,73,976
faktaprogram/70,9,976
faldskærm/20,7,70,976,939,947
familiemedlem/70,9,976
fantasteri/70,10,73,976
fedtstof/70,9,976
femkamp/20,7,70,976
ferieparadis/70,10,73,976
fes/70,9,976,941,947
finlandssvensker/20,7,70,976
firemotorersfly/70,252,10,976
firtal/70,9,976
flab/20,7,70,976
flammesværd/70,252,10,976
flos/70,9,976
flyveblad/10,70,20,976
foderstof/70,9,976
fokkeskøde/70,10,73,976
forbryderalbum/70,9,976
forbundsland/10,70,20,976
foreningsmøde/70,10,73,976
forlem/70,9,976
formøde/70,10,73,976
fornyer/20,7,70,976
forskningsprogram/70,9,976
forsæt/70,9,976
forsøg/70,252,10,976,939,947
fragtskib/10,70,20,976,939,947
fremkalderbad/10,70,20,976
friluftsbad/10,70,20,976
frimærkealbum/70,9,976
frysepunkt/70,10,73,976,939,947
funktionærlov/20,7,70,976
fællesbo/70,10,73,976
førerhus/10,70,20,976
gadeløb/70,252,10,976
gartnermedhjælper/20,7,70,976
garvestof/70,9,976
gemak/70,9,976
gemmested/70,10,73,976
georgineknold/20,7,70,976
giftstof/70,9,976
gitter/70,85,10,976,941,947
glughul/70,9,976
gospelsang/20,7,70,976
grandprix/70,10,73,976
gribebræt/70,9,976
grusgrav/20,7,70,976,941,939,947
græs/70,9,976,941,947
grønkorn/70,252,10,976
gummibold/20,7,70,976
gæstetoilet/70,9,976
hackerangreb/70,252,10,976
halmpresser/20,7,70,976
hautrelief/70,9,976
havbad/10,70,20,976
heppekor/70,252,10,976
heraldiker/20,7,70,976
hjemmepublikum/70,9,976
hjort/20,7,70,976,940,947
housewarmingparty/70,10,73,976
hovedland/10,70,20,976
hul/70,9,976,941,947
hveps/20,7,70,976,940,947
hygiejnebind/70,252,10,976
højdemåler/20,7,70,976
hårpisk/20,7,70,976
ikkemetal/70,9,976
ildskær/70,252,10,976
indianer/20,7,70,976,941,947
instrumentbræt/70,9,976
interessentskab/70,10,73,976
interviewdeltager/20,7,70,976
jernbanearbejder/20,7,70,976
juk/70,9,976
justitsmord/70,252,10,976
kabyler/20,7,70,976
kantsten/20,7,70,976,939,947
kardiogram/70,9,976
katteøje/70,10,73,976
kedelhus/10,70,20,976
klamphugger/20,7,70,976
klubmedlem/70,9,976
klummerhoved/70,10,73,976
kommunalbestyrelsesmedlem/70,9,976
kompostkværn/20,7,70,976
kondylom/70,10,73,976
kontinuum/70,9,976
krigsfartøj/70,10,73,976
krog/20,7,70,976,941,947
krondiamantbryllup/70,9,976
kvadrat/70,10,73,976,941,947
kælk/20,7,70,976,940,947
laboratoriearbejde/70,10,73,976
laf/70,9,976
landsforræder/20,7,70,976
legeme/70,10,73,976,939,947
lem/70,9,976
linedanser/20,7,70,976
lokalmiljø/70,10,73,976
lokum/70,9,976,939,947
lystbådehavn/20,7,70,976
lærebogssystem/70,10,73,976
lærredsstof/70,9,976
mangroveskov/20,7,70,976
marked/70,10,73,976,939,947
maskebal/70,9,976
mellemgrund/20,7,70,976
middelhavsområde/70,10,73,976
mikronæringsstof/70,9,976
modspørgsmål/70,252,10,976
modvægt/20,7,70,976
monogram/70,9,976
mål/70,252,10,976,941,947
månesegl/20,7,70,976
nationalitetsprincip/70,9,976
neg/70,252,10,976
nodevender/20,7,70,976
nytårsforsæt/70,9,976
obligationsmarked/70,10,73,976
omsætter/20,7,70,976
ordsprog/70,252,10,976,939,947
organigram/70,9,976
overliggerdag/20,7,70,976
parket/70,9,976,941,947
parlamentærflag/70,252,10,976
pelsfarm/20,7,70,976
piktogram/70,9,976
piskesmæld/70,252,10,976,939,947
poker/20,7,70,976,941,947
portræt/70,9,976,941,947
printkort/70,252,10,976
programmel/70,9,976
prås/20,7,70,976
pølsebrød/70,252,10,976
raritetskabinet/70,9,976
regionaltog/10,70,20,976
relief/70,9,976
rendezvous/70,10,73,976
roll-on-roll-off-skib/10,70,20,976
romerlys/70,252,10,976
rædselskabinet/70,9,976
rådnetank/20,7,70,976
samfundsbillede/70,10,73,976
sandhedsserum/70,9,976
sekstenårsfødselsdag/20,7,70,976
serum/70,9,976,941,947
serviceeftersyn/70,252,10,976
skallesmækker/20,7,70,976
skelet/70,9,976,941,947
skisportssted/70,10,73,976
skrubhøvl/20,7,70,976
skærebræt/70,9,976
skærmkort/70,252,10,976
slurk/20,7,70,976
smitstof/70,9,976
snefog/70,252,10,976
softwareprogram/70,9,976
soltag/10,70,20,976
spinet/70,9,976
spisebord/10,70,20,976
sprogrenser/20,7,70,976
standardprogram/70,9,976
statspapir/70,10,73,976
stjernenavn/10,70,20,976
straffe/70,10,73,976
stretchstof/70,9,976
styrter/20,7,70,976
subjekt/70,10,73,976,939,947
sydtysker/20,7,70,976
syvtal/70,9,976
sækkelærred/70,10,73,976
talentspejder/20,7,70,976
taskenspilleri/70,10,73,976
tegneprogram/70,9,976
tidrøver/20,7,70,976
tilbagesvar/70,252,10,976
tilsætningsstof/70,9,976
tornekrans/20,7,70,976
totalforlis/70,252,10,976
trashmetal/70,9,976
trækhest/20,7,70,976
tulipantræ/70,10,73,976
tyl/70,9,976,939,947
udenlandsdansker/20,7,70,976
udlejningsfirma/70,10,73,976
undervisningsprogram/70,9,976
universitet/70,10,73,976,939,947
urobetjent/20,7,70,976
vat/70,9,976,941,947
velstandssamfund/70,252,10,976
vendekreds/20,7,70,976
vogntog/70,252,10,976
vold/20,7,70,976
vægtstangsprincip/70,9,976
zeta/70,10,73,976,941,947
æskulapsnog/20,7,70,976
årsbudget/70,9,976
